Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4422
Federal order; enforceable.

An order issued by any district court of the United States enjoining a risk retention group from soliciting or selling insurance or operating in any state, in all states, or in any territory or possession of the United States upon a finding that such group is in a hazardous financial condition shall be enforceable in the courts of this state.

Laws 1987, LB 514, § 22.